test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-miciso_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mîciso - ok : # Ordinary VAI verb "eat" - full paradigm
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimîcison
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimîcison
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mîcisow
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: mîcisoyiwa
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimîcisonân
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kimîcisonaw
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimîcisonâwâw
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mîcisowak
     mîciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl: mîcisoyiwa
     
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: ê-mîcisoyân
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: ê-mîcisoyan
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: ê-mîcisot
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3oSg: ê-mîcisoyit
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: ê-mîcisoyâhk
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: ê-mîcisoyahk
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: ê-mîcisoyêk
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: ê-mîcisocik
     mîciso+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3oPl: ê-mîcisoyit

     mîciso+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîciso
     mîciso+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcisok
     mîciso+V+IA+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mîcisotân
  
     mîciso+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcisohkan
     mîciso+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcisohkêk
     mîciso+V+IA+Imp+Del+12Pl: mîcisohkahk
